District of Columbia statutes.
31-1609

Rules.

The Mayor shall issue proposed rules, within 90 days of August 7, 1986, to implement the provisions of this chapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council of the District of Columbia (“Council”) for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not disapprove the proposed rules by resolution, within the 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved. The Council may approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution prior to the expiration of the 45-day review period.

Aug. 7, 1986, D.C. Law 6-132, § 10, 33 DCR 3615
1981 Ed., § 35-229.